Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.225.110

Fines applied to support of schools.

Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 10.82.070, fifty percent of all fines except as otherwise provided in RCW 28A.225.010 through 28A.225.140 shall be applied to the support of the public schools in the school district where such offense was committed: PROVIDED, That all fees, fines, forfeitures, and penalties collected or assessed by a district court because of the violation of a state law shall be remitted as provided in chapter 3.62 RCW, and fifty percent shall be paid to the county treasurer who shall deposit such amount to the credit of the courts in the county for the exclusive purpose of enforcing the provisions of RCW 28A.225.010 through 28A.225.140.

[ 1995 c 312 s 75; 1990 c 33 s 228; 1987 c 202 s 191; 1969 ex.s. c 199 s 54; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.27.104. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 368 s 11; RRS s 5082; prior: 1907 c 231 s 12; 1905 c 162 s 11. Formerly RCW 28A.27.104, 28.27.104, 28.27.100, part.]

NOTES:

Short title—1995 c 312: See note following RCW 13.32A.010.

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.